math.aff
SET UTF-8

# S: regular plural, add -s
SFX S Y 1
SFX S 0 s .

# E: plural for words ending in s/x/z/sh/ch, add -es
SFX E Y 1
SFX E 0 es .

# Y: plural for words ending in consonant+y, -y → -ies
SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y y ies [^aeiou]y

# L: adverb form, add -ly
SFX L Y 2
SFX L 0 ly [^l]
SFX L 0 ly ll

# D: past tense
SFX D Y 3
SFX D e ed [^aeiou]e
SFX D 0 d e
SFX D 0 ed [^e]

# G: gerund, add -ing
SFX G Y 3
SFX G e ing [^aeiou]e
SFX G 0 ing [^e]
SFX G 0 ing e

# U: Latin -um → -a (extremum → extrema)
SFX U Y 1
SFX U um a um

# O: Greek -on → -a (dodecahedron → dodecahedra)
SFX O Y 1
SFX O on a on

# X: Latin -ix → -ices (directrix → directrices)
SFX X Y 1
SFX X ix ices ix
